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PRE−CHECK
1. DIAGNOSIS SYSTEM
(a) As shown in the following diagram, ECUs of this vehicle

are connected each other by communication buses
through which various signals are transmitted. These
communication buses are diagnosed by the Body ECU.
When the Body ECU detects a communication error be-
tween ECUs, or B+ short or GND short of a communica-
tion bus, a DTC is output and memorized. The Body ECU
cannot diagnose accurately unless it can function normal-
ly. Therefore, first confirm the normal condition by per-
forming a ”BASIC INSPECTION” described later and
then, troubleshoot against each DTC.
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(b) If DTC of ECU communication stop is output, connectors
may be disconnected, or communication buses may be
open at 2 points. It will not become abnormal with only 1
communication bus open.

(c) If 2 communication buses are open at the position as
shown in the illustration, DTCof ECUcommunication stop
between those 2 buses is output.
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2. BASIC INSPECTION
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Inspect Body ECU.

1 Check that the DTC can be read from Body ECU using hand−held tester.

OK Go to step 3 ”DTC check”.

NG

2 Check the Body ECU power source circuit.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the Body ECU connector.
CHECK:
Check voltage terminal BECU, BDR1 SIG and GND.
OK:

Voltage: 10 − 14 V
CHECK:
Check continuity terminal GND1, 2 and body ground.
OK:

Continuity
PREPARATION:
Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Check voltage terminal ACC and GND1, 2.
OK:

Voltage: 10 − 14 V

NG Replace or repair wire harness or connector.

OK
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3 Check wire harness between Body ECU and DLC3.

HINT:
If there is a failure on SIL line, hand−held tester cannot communicate with ECM or Airbag sensor assembly
also.

NG Replace or repair wire harness or connector.

OK

Replace the Body ECU.
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3. DTC CHECK (Using hand−held tester)
(a) Prepare a hand−held tester.
(b) Connect the hand−held tester to DLC3.
(c) Turn the ignition switch ON and switch the hand−held tes-

ter main switch ON.
(d) Use the hand−held tester to check the DTCs, and note

them down. (For opening instructions, see the hand−held
tester’s instruction book.)

(e) Check the DLC3.
The vehicle’s ECM uses ISO 9141−2 for communication.
The terminal arrangement of DLC3 complies with SAE
J1962 and matches the ISO 9141−2 format.

Terminal No. Connection/Specified Condition Condition

4 (CG) Chassis Ground� Body Ground/1 or less Always

13 (TC) TC � Body Ground/9 − 14 V Always

HINT:
If your display shows ”UNABLE TO CONNECT TO VEHICLE”
when you have connected the cable of the hand−held tester to
DLC3, turned the ignition switch ON and operated the hand−
held tester, there is a problem on the vehicle side or tool side.
S If communication is normal when the tool is connected to

another vehicle, inspect DLC3 on the original vehicle.
S If communication is still not possible when the tool is con-

nected to another vehicle, the problem is probably in the
tool itself, so consult the Service Department listed in the
tool’s instruction manual.

4. DTC CLEARANCE
S PRESENT CODE:

DTCwill be cleared when the trouble output as DTC is re-
covered normally.

S PAST CODE:
Clear it using the hand−held tester.


